Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 39.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1449
Advisory council members; expenses.

Members of the
advisory council to the Office of Violence Prevention shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174
to 81-1177.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 39.